Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska50-422
Health and Human Services Committee; behavioral health insurance parity study and actuarial analysis; report.

The Health and Human Services Committee of the Legislature shall provide for an independent study and actuarial analysis of the impact of behavioral health insurance parity legislation in the State of Nebraska. A report of such study and analysis shall be submitted to the Governor, the Health and Human Services Committee of the Legislature, and the Banking, Commerce and Insurance Committee of the Legislature on or before December 1, 2006.

Laws 2006, LB 1248, § 89.